Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB751.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2116(a)(1) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 2116. Inheritance Tax.--(a) (1) Inheritance tax upon the transfer of property passing to or for the use of any [of the following shall be at the rate of four and one-half per cent:(i) grandfather, grandmother, father, mother, except transfers under subclause (1.2), and lineal descendants; or12345678910111213141516171819202122 (ii) wife or widow and husband or widower of a child.] grandfather, grandmother, father, mother, except transfers under subclause (1.2), and lineal descendants or any wife or widow and husband or widower of a child shall be at the rate provided in the following schedule:(i) Four and one-half per cent for the estate of a decedent dying before July 1, 2026.(ii) Four and one-quarter per cent for the estate of a decedent dying on or after July 1, 2026, and before July 1, 2027.(iii) Four per cent for the estate of a decedent dying on or after July 1, 2027, and before July 1, 2028.(iv) Three and three-quarters per cent for the estate of a decedent dying on or after July 1, 2028, and before July 1, 2029.(v) Three and one-quarter per cent for the estate of a decedent dying on or after July 1, 2029, and before July 1, 2030.(vi) Two and three-quarters per cent for the estate of a decedent dying on or after July 1, 2030, and before July 1, 2031.(vii) Two and one-quarter per cent for the estate of a decedent dying on or after July 1, 2031, and before July 1, 2032.(viii) One and three-quarters per cent for the estate of a decedent dying on or after July 1, 2032, and before July 1, 2033.(ix) One and one-quarter per cent for the estate of a decedent dying on or after July 1, 2033, and before July 1, 2034.20250SB0751PN0925 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (x) Three quarters per cent for the estate of a decedent dying on or after July 1, 2034, and before July 1, 2035.(xi) Zero per cent for the estate of a decedent dying on or after July 1, 2035.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0751PN0925 - 3 - 123456